Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.155

Officers.

The officers of a corporation shall consist of a president, one or more vice presidents, a secretary, a treasurer and such other officers and assistant officers as may be deemed necessary, each of whom shall be elected or appointed at such time and in such manner and for such terms not exceeding three years as may be prescribed in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. In the absence of any such provision, all officers shall be elected or appointed annually by the board of directors. If the bylaws so provide, any two or more offices may be held by the same person, except the offices of president and secretary.

The articles of incorporation or the bylaws may provide that any one or more officers of the corporation shall be ex officio members of the board of directors.

The officers of a corporation may be designated by such additional titles as may be provided in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 31.]